Hawaii statutes.
[§195D-26] Annual report; endangered
species. The department, after consultation with the endangered species
recovery committee, by December 31 of each year, shall prepare a report
summarizing:

(1) The status of all endangered, threatened,
proposed, and candidate species for which incidental take licenses pursuant to
sections 195D-4 and 195D-22 have been issued and the effectiveness of all
habitat conservation plans and safe harbor agreements that have been approved;

(2) The condition of the trust fund established under
this chapter, including receipts and expenditures over the previous fiscal
year; and

(3) Any recommendations to further the purposes of
this chapter.

The report and all information pertaining to
incidental take licenses shall be available to the public. [L 1997, c 380, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next